Washington statutes.
RCW 18.185.090

Notice concerning agent's status—Forced entry—Discharge of firearm.

(1) A bail bond agency shall notify the director within thirty days after the death or termination of employment of any employee who is a licensed bail bond agent.

(2) A bail bond agency shall notify the director within seventy-two hours upon receipt of information affecting a licensed bail bond agent's continuing eligibility to hold a license under the provisions of this chapter.

(3) A bail bond agent or bail bond recovery agent shall notify the director within seventy-two hours upon receipt of information affecting the bail bond recovery agent's continuing eligibility to hold a bail bond recovery agent's license under the provisions of this chapter.

(4) A bail bond recovery agent shall notify the director within ten business days following a forced entry for the purpose of apprehending a fugitive criminal defendant, whether planned or unplanned. The notification under this subsection must include information required by rule of the director.

(5) A bail bond recovery agent shall notify the local law enforcement agency whenever the bail bond recovery agent discharges his or her firearm while on duty, other than on a supervised firearms range. The notification must be made within ten business days of the date the firearm is discharged.

[ 2008 c 105 s 3; 2004 c 186 s 7; 1993 c 260 s 10.]

NOTES:

Legislative recognition—2004 c 186: See note following RCW 18.185.010.